Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-430
Criminal detention facility; juvenile detention facility; emergency use.

In the event of an emergency and only after all other temporary placement options have been exhausted, the Office of Juvenile Services may provide for the placement of a juvenile for a period not to exceed seven days at a criminal detention facility, if allowed by law, or a juvenile detention facility, as such terms are defined in section 83-4,125.

Laws 2020, LB1140, § 8.